Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 6
GAMING TAX

44-30-601. Gaming tax.

There is hereby imposed a gaming tax on the adjusted gross proceeds of gaming allowed by this article 30. The tax is set by rule as promulgated by the commission. The commission shall not set the tax at more than forty percent of the adjusted gross proceeds. In setting the tax rate, the commission shall consider the need to provide money to the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek for historic restoration and preservation; the impact on the communities and any state agency, including infrastructure, law enforcement, environment, public health and safety, education requirements, human services, and other components due to limited gaming; the impact on licensees and the profitability of their operations; the profitability of similar forms of gambling in other states; and the expenses of the commission and the division for their administration and operation. The commission shall also consider the following:

The amount shall never exceed the percentage provided in section 9 (5)(a) of article XVIII of the state constitution;

The amount shall be established in conformity with the spirit and interest of this article 30 so as to encourage business growth and investment in the gaming industry and to permit licensed operations, under normal business conditions and operation procedures, to realize a fair and just profit;

The amount shall take into account unreimbursed local financial burdens associated with limited gaming-related operations;

In setting the amount, the commission shall take into account profit levels after expenses of similar forms of gaming in other states;

The amount shall take into account capital costs required to comply with local, state, or federal requirements; financial reserves required by the commission for payments to winners; and investments necessitated by regulatory requirements of the commission;

The amount shall permit the licensed operator a reasonable profit after expenses, including:

Capital costs associated with the licensed premises;

Capital costs associated with limited gaming equipment;

Capital costs required to comply with local or state requirements;

Extraordinary operating costs, including the provision of housing or transportation, or both, for employees;

Initial costs associated with commencement of limited gaming;

Financial reserves required by the commission for payment to winners;

Investments necessitated by regulatory requirements of the commission; and

If local voters in one or more cities revise any limits on gaming as provided in section 9 (7)(a) of article XVIII of the state constitution:

Any commission action that increases the percentage of gaming taxes from the percentages imposed as of July 1, 2008, shall be effective only if approved by voters at a statewide election held under section 20 (4)(a) of article X of the state constitution; and

Gaming tax revenues attributable to the locally approved revisions shall be collected and spent as a voter-approved revenue change without regard to any limitation contained in section 20 of article X of the state constitution or any other law.

When adopting or amending any rule affecting the applicable tax rate or any other attribute or policy relating to application of the gaming tax authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall consider the impact on recipients of limited gaming tax proceeds, including those from extended limited gaming.

The department shall collect the amount of gaming tax on adjusted gross proceeds determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section from the licensed retailer and shall have all of the powers, rights, and duties provided in articles 20, 21, and 26 of title 39 to carry out the collection. The commission shall authorize reimbursement to the department of the costs associated with collection of gaming tax on adjusted gross proceeds from licensed operators pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, upon documentation of the costs satisfactory to the commission.

All money collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the limited gaming fund created by section 9 (5)(a) of article XVIII of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 196, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-601 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-602. Return and remittance.

Not later than fifteen days following the end of each retail month, each licensed retailer shall make a return and remittance to the director on forms prescribed and furnished by the director. The director may grant an extension of not more than five days for filing a return and remittance; except that the director shall not grant more than two extensions during any one-year period. Unless an extension is granted, a penalty or interest under section 44-30-604 shall be paid if a return or remittance is not made on time.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 197, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-602 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-603. Violations of taxation provisions - penalties.

Any person who:

Makes any false or fraudulent return in attempting to defeat or evade the tax imposed by this article 30 commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401;

Fails to pay tax due under this article 30 within thirty days after the date the tax becomes due commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501;

Fails to file a return required by this article 30 within thirty days after the date the return is due commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501;

Violates either subsection (1)(b) or (1)(c) of this section two or more times in any twelve-month period commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401;

Willfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, or advises the preparation or presentation under or in connection with any matter arising under any title administered by the commission or a return, affidavit, claim, or other document that is fraudulent or is false as to any material fact, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, affidavit, claim, or document commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

For purposes of this section, "person" includes corporate officers having control or supervision of, or responsibility for, completing tax returns or making payments pursuant to this article 30.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 197, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(b) and (1)(c) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3329, § 790, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-603 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-604. Returns and reports - failure to file - penalties.

Any person who fails to file a return or report required by this article 30, which return or report includes taxable transactions, on or before the date the return or report is due as prescribed in section 44-30-602 is subject to the payment of an additional amount assessed as a penalty equal to fifteen percent of the tax or ten dollars, whichever is greater; except that, for good cause shown, the executive director may reduce or eliminate the penalty.

Any person subject to taxation under this article 30 who fails to pay the tax within the time prescribed is subject to an interest charge of two percent per month or portion thereof for the period of time during which the payment is late or five dollars, whichever is greater.

Penalty and interest are considered the same as a tax for the purposes of collection and enforcement, including liens, distraint warrants, and criminal violations.

Any payment received for taxes, penalties, or interest is applied first to the tax, beginning with the oldest delinquency, then to interest and then to penalty.

The executive director may, upon application of the taxpayer, establish a maximum interest rate of twenty-four percent upon delinquent taxes if the executive director determines that the delinquent payment was caused by a mistake of law and was not caused by an intent to evade the tax.

The procedures for collection of any taxes and penalties due under this article 30 and the authority of the department to collect the taxes and penalties shall be the same as those provided for the collection of sales taxes pursuant to articles 20, 21, and 26 of title 39.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 198, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-604 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-605. Local jurisdiction.

Nothing in this article 30 shall impair or otherwise affect the power of the municipalities where limited gaming is authorized to impose a fee upon gaming devices used in limited gaming.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 199, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-605 as it existed prior to 2018.